West Virginia, session 2026, HB4246.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 7. Authorization for Department of revenue to promulgate legislative rules. §64-7-1. Insurance Commission. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 22, 2025, authorized under the authority of §33-27-14 of this code, modified by the Insurance Commission to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on August 21, 2025, relating to the Insurance Commission (insurance holding company systems, 114 CSR 35), is authorized.